Utah statutes.
59-2-328.   Duty of auditor upon termination of treasurer's term of office.

If the assessment book or the delinquent tax list is transferred from one treasurer to another, the county auditor shall credit the one and charge the other with the amount of taxes then outstanding.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 4, 1987 General Session

